en: Unfortified diet chocolate breakfast cereals
fr: Céréales au chocolat pour petit-déjeuner équilibré non enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast chocolate high-fiber cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales au chocolat riches en fibres pour petit déjeuner enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Unfilled breakfast chocolate cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales chocolatées pour petit déjeuner non fourrées mais enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals filled with chocolate
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner fourrées au chocolat
hr: Žitarice za doručak punjene čokoladom
nl: Ontbijtgranen gevuld met chocola

en: Breakfast cereals filled with chocolate-hazelnuts
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner fourrées au chocolat-noisettes

en: Breakfast cereals filled with chocolate fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner fourrées au chocolat enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals filled with chocolate-hazelnuts fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner fourrées au chocolat-noisettes enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals filled with something other than chocolate fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner fourrées fourrage autre que chocolat enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals rich in fibre
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner riches en fibres

en: Breakfast cereals rich in fibre fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner riches en fibres enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals rich in fibre with fruits fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner riches en fibres avec fruits enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals rich in fibre without fruits fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner riches en fibres sans fruits enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Diet breakfast cereals
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre

en: Diet breakfast cereals fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Diet breakfast cereals with honey fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre au miel enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Diet breakfast cereals plain fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre nature enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Diet breakfast cereals with fruits
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre aux fruits

en: Diet breakfast cereals with fruits fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre aux fruits enrichies en vitamines et minéraux

en: Breakfast cereals diet with dried fruits fortified with vitamins and chemical elements
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre aux fruits secs (à coque) enrichis en vitamines et minéraux

en: Diet breakfast cereals with fruits not fortified
fr: Céréales pour petit déjeuner équilibre aux fruits non enrichies en vitamines et minéraux